Vermont, session 2025-2026, S88.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 32 V.S.A. chapter 105, subchapter 2 is amended to read:
Subchapter 2. Vermont Employment Growth Incentive Program
§ 3330. PURPOSE; FORM OF INCENTIVES; ENHANCED INCENTIVES;
ELIGIBLE APPLICANT
* * *
VT LEG #380691 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.88
2025 Page 2 of 6
(b) Form of incentives; enhanced incentives.
(1) The Vermont Economic Progress Council may approve an incentive
under this subchapter in the form of a direct cash payment in annual
installments.
(2) The Council may approve the following enhanced incentives:
(A) an enhanced incentive for a business in a labor market area with
higher than average unemployment or lower than average wages pursuant to
section 3334 of this title; and
(B) an enhanced incentive for an environmental technology business
pursuant to section 3335 of this title.; and
(C) [Repealed.]
(D) an enhanced incentive for an employee-owned business pursuant
to section 3335a of this title.
* * *
§ 3331. DEFINITIONS
* * *
(9) “Qualifying job” means a new, permanent position in Vermont that
meets each of the following criteria:
(A) The position is filled by:
(i) a non-owner employee who regularly works at least 35 hours
each week; or
VT LEG #380691 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.88
2025 Page 3 of 6
(ii) an employee of an employee-owned business, pursuant to
section 3335a of this title, who regularly works at least 35 hours each week.
* * *
§ 3333. CALCULATING THE VALUE OF AN INCENTIVE
Except as otherwise provided for an enhanced incentive for a business in a
qualifying labor market area under pursuant to section 3334 of this title or, an
enhanced incentive for an environmental technology business under pursuant
to section 3335 of this title, or an enhanced incentive for an employee-owned
business pursuant to section 3335a of this title, the Council shall calculate the
value of an incentive for an award year as follows:
(1) Calculate new revenue growth. To calculate new revenue growth,
the Council shall use the cost-benefit model created pursuant to section 3326
of this title to determine the amount by which the new revenue generated by
the proposed economic activity to the State exceeds the costs of the activity to
the State.
(2) Calculate the business’s potential share of new revenue growth.
Except as otherwise provided for an environmental technology business in
pursuant to section 3335 of this title or an employee-owned business pursuant
to section 3335a of this title, to calculate the business’s potential share of new
revenue growth, the Council shall multiply the new revenue growth determined
under subdivision (1) of this subsection by 80 percent.
VT LEG #380691 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.88
2025 Page 4 of 6
* * *
§ 3335. ENHANCED INCENTIVE FOR ENVIRONMENTAL
TECHNOLOGY BUSINESS
* * *
§ 3335a. ENHANCED INCENTIVE FOR EMPLOYEE-OWNED
BUSINESSES
(a) As used in this section, “employee-owned business” means the
following:
(1) an “employee stock ownership plan,” which means an employee
stock ownership plan as defined in 26 U.S.C. § 4975(e)(7), as may be
amended; or
(2) a “worker cooperative,” which means:
(A) an eligible worker-owned cooperative as defined in 26 U.S.C.
§ 1042(c), as may be amended;
(B) a worker cooperative organized under 11 V.S.A. chapter 8; or
(C) an organization that meets the following criteria:
(i) employees of the organization constitute a majority of
its membership;
(ii) members of the organization hold a majority of the
voting power;
VT LEG #380691 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.88
2025 Page 5 of 6
(iii) members of the organization have the authority to elect a
majority of the board of directors on the basis of one person, one vote; and
(iv) the organization allocates a majority of its allocated earnings
and losses to members on the basis of:
(I) patronage;
(II) capital contributions; or
(III) a combination of subdivisions (I) and (II) of this
subdivision (2)(C)(iv); and
(3) seeks an incentive for economic activity in Vermont pursuant to this
subchapter.
(b) The Council shall consider and administer an application from an
employee-owned business pursuant to the provisions of this subchapter, except
that:
(1) the business’s potential share of new revenue growth shall be 90
percent; and
(2) to calculate qualifying payroll, the Council shall:
(A) determine the background growth rate in payroll for the
applicable business sector in the award year;
(B) multiply the business’s full-time payroll for the award year by 20
percent of the background growth rate; and
VT LEG #380691 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.88
2025 Page 6 of 6
(C) subtract the product from the payroll performance requirement
for the award year.
(c) The purpose of the enhanced incentive for employee-owned businesses
is to support the growth of these locally owned and controlled businesses,
which typically provide higher wages and benefits to their employees.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #380691 v.1